Illinois, session 104th, HB5468.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 62605-51 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-51)8    Sec. 2605-51. Division of the Academy and Training.9    (a) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 10exercise, but not be limited to, the following functions:11        (1) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police 12    Training Academy.13        (2) Train and prepare new officers for a career in law 14    enforcement, with innovative, quality training and 15    educational practices.16        (3) Offer continuing training and educational programs 17    for Illinois State Police employees.18        (4) Oversee the Illinois State Police's recruitment 19    initiatives.20        (5) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police's 21    quartermaster.22        (6) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 23    Article 5, Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code   HB5468- 2 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    concerning testing and training officers on the detection 2    of impaired driving.3        (7) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 4    Article 108B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 5    (a-5) Successful completion of the Illinois State Police 6Academy satisfies the minimum standards pursuant to 7subsections (a), (b), and (d) of Section 7 of the Illinois 8Police Training Act and exempts Illinois State Police officers 9from the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board's 10State Comprehensive Examination and Equivalency Examination. 11Satisfactory completion shall be evidenced by a commission or 12certificate issued to the officer. 13    (b) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 14exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested in the former 15Division of State Troopers by Section 17 of the Illinois State 16Police Act.17    (c) Specialized training. The Division of the Academy and 18Training shall provide the following specialized training: 19        (1) Crash reconstruction specialist; training. The 20    Division of the Academy and Training shall cooperate with 21    the Division of Forensic Services to provide specialized 22    training in crash reconstruction for Illinois State Police 23    officers. Only Illinois State Police officers who 24    successfully complete the training may be assigned as 25    crash reconstruction specialists.26        (2) Death and homicide investigations; training. The   HB5468- 3 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    Division of the Academy and Training shall provide 2    training in death and homicide investigation for Illinois 3    State Police officers. Only Illinois State Police officers 4    who successfully complete the training may be assigned as 5    lead investigators in death and homicide investigations. 6    Satisfactory completion of the training shall be evidenced 7    by a certificate issued to the officer by the Division of 8    the Academy and Training. The Director shall develop a 9    process for waiver applications for officers whose prior 10    training and experience as homicide investigators may 11    qualify them for a waiver. The Director may issue a 12    waiver, at his or her discretion, based solely on the 13    prior training and experience of an officer as a homicide 14    investigator.15            (A) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 16        require all homicide investigator training to include 17        instruction on victim-centered, trauma-informed 18        investigation. This training must be implemented by 19        July 1, 2023.20            (B) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 21        cooperate with the Division of Criminal Investigation 22        to develop a model curriculum on victim-centered, 23        trauma-informed investigation. This curriculum must be 24        implemented by July 1, 2023. 25        (3) Investigation of officer-involved criminal sexual 26    assault; training. The Division of the Academy and   HB5468- 4 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 2    Investigation to provide a specialized criminal sexual 3    assault and sexual abuse investigation training program 4    for Illinois State Police officers. Only Illinois State 5    Police officers who successfully complete the training may 6    be assigned as investigators in officer-involved criminal 7    sexual assault investigations under Section 10 of the Law 8    Enforcement Criminal Sexual Assault Investigation Act. 9        (4) Investigation of officer-involved deaths; 10    training. The Division of the Academy and Training shall 11    have a written policy regarding the investigation of 12    officer-involved deaths that involve a law enforcement 13    officer employed by the Illinois State Police as required 14    under Section 1-10 of the Police and Community Relations 15    Improvement Act and shall provide specialized training in 16    that policy for Illinois State Police officers. 17        (5) Juvenile specialist; training. The Division of the 18    Academy and Training shall provide specialized juvenile 19    training for Illinois State Police officers who meet the 20    definition of "juvenile police officer" as defined under 21    paragraph (17) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 22    1987. Juvenile specialists may complete questioning of 23    juveniles on school grounds as provided under Section 24    22-88 of the School Code. 25        (6) Peer support program; training. The Division of 26    the Academy and Training shall cooperate with the Office   HB5468- 5 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    of the Director to provide peer support advisors with 2    appropriate specialized training in counseling to conduct 3    peer support counseling sessions under Section 10 of the 4    First Responders Suicide Prevention Act. 5        (7) Police dog training standards; training. All 6    police dogs used by the Illinois State Police for drug 7    enforcement purposes pursuant to the Cannabis Control Act, 8    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and the 9    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act shall 10    be trained by programs that meet the certification 11    requirements set by the Director or the Director's 12    designee. Satisfactory completion of the training shall be 13    evidenced by a certificate issued by the Division of the 14    Academy and Training.15        (8) Safe2Help; training. The Division of the Academy 16    and Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 17    Investigation to ensure all program personnel or call 18    center staff, or both, are appropriately trained in the 19    areas described in subsection (f) of Section 10 of the 20    Student Confidential Reporting Act. (10)21    (c-5) In-service training.22        (1) At least once, the Division of the Academy and 23    Training shall develop and require the following 24    in-service training opportunities to be completed by 25    Illinois State Police officers:26            (A) Cell phone medical information; training.   HB5468- 6 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        Training required under this subparagraph (A) shall 2        provide instruction on accessing and using medical 3        information stored in cell phones. The Division may 4        use the program approved under Section 2310-711 of the 5        Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of 6        the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to develop 7        the Division's program.8            (B) Autism spectrum disorders; training. Training 9        required under this subparagraph (B) shall instruct 10        Illinois State Police officers on the nature of autism 11        spectrum disorders and in identifying and 12        appropriately responding to individuals with autism 13        spectrum disorders. The Illinois State Police shall 14        review the training curriculum and may consult with 15        the Department of Public Health or the Department of 16        Human Services to update the training curriculum as 17        needed.18        (2) At least every year, the Division of the Academy 19    and Training shall provide the following in-service 20    training to Illinois State Police officers:21            (A) Cultural diversity; training.22                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 23            (A) shall provide training and continuing 24            education to Illinois State Police officers 25            concerning cultural diversity, including topics 26            such as sensitivity toward racial and ethnic   HB5468- 7 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1            differences.2                (ii) This training and continuing education 3            shall, among other things, emphasize that the 4            primary purpose of enforcement of the Illinois 5            Vehicle Code is safety and equal, uniform, and 6            non-discriminatory enforcement of the law.7            (B) Minimum annual in-service training 8        requirements. Minimum annual in-service training 9        includes:10                (i) crisis intervention training;11                (ii) emergency medical response training and 12            certification;13                (iii) firearm qualification training;14                (iv) law updates; and15                (v) officer wellness and mental health.16            (C) Firearms restraining orders; training. 17        Training required under this subparagraph (C) shall 18        provide instruction on the processes used to file a 19        firearms restraining order, to identify situations in 20        which a firearms restraining order is appropriate, and 21        to safely promote the usage of the firearms 22        restraining order in different situations.23        (3) At least every 3 years, the Division of the 24    Academy and Training shall provide the following 25    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:26            (A) Arrest and use of force and control tactics;   HB5468- 8 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        training. Training required under this subparagraph 2        (A) shall provide to Illinois State Police officers 3        training and continuing education concerning knowledge 4        of policies and laws regulating the use of force; 5        shall equip officers with tactics and skills, 6        including de-escalation techniques, to prevent or 7        reduce the need to use force or, when force must be 8        used, to use force that is objectively reasonable, 9        necessary, and proportional under the totality of the 10        circumstances; and shall ensure appropriate 11        supervision and accountability. The training shall 12        consist of at least 30 hours and shall include:13                (i) at least 12 hours of hands-on, 14            scenario-based role-playing;15                (ii) at least 6 hours of instruction on use of 16            force techniques, including the use of 17            de-escalation techniques to prevent or reduce the 18            need for force whenever safe and feasible;19                (iii) specific training on the law concerning 20            stops, searches, and the use of force under the 21            Fourth Amendment to the United States 22            Constitution;23                (iv) specific training on officer safety 24            techniques, including cover, concealment, and 25            time; and26                (v) at least 6 hours of training focused on   HB5468- 9 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1            high-risk traffic stops.2            (B) Minimum triennial in-service training 3        requirements. Minimum triennial in-service training 4        required this under this subparagraph (B) includes 5        training and continuing education to Illinois State 6        Police officers concerning:7                (i) constitutional and proper use of law 8            enforcement authority;9                (ii) civil and human rights;10                (iii) cultural competency, including implicit 11            bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity; and12                (iv) procedural justice.13            (C) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 14        under this subparagraph (C) must be approved by the 15        Department of Children and Family Services as provided 16        under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 17        Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting 18        of child abuse and neglect.19            (D) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training.20                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 21            (D) shall include in-service training on sexual 22            assault and sexual abuse response and training on 23            report writing requirements, including, but not 24            limited to, the following:25                    (a) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;26                    (b) understanding the role trauma has   HB5468- 10 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1                played in a victim's life;2                    (c) responding to the needs and concerns 3                of a victim;4                    (d) delivering services in a 5                compassionate, sensitive, and nonjudgmental 6                manner;7                    (e) interviewing techniques in accordance 8                with the curriculum standards in subdivision 9                (iii) of this subparagraph;10                    (f) understanding cultural perceptions and 11                common myths of sexual assault and sexual 12                abuse; and13                    (g) report writing techniques in 14                accordance with the curriculum standards in 15                subdivision (iii) of this subparagraph and the 16                Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.17                (ii) Instructors providing training under this 18            subparagraph (D) (G) shall have successfully 19            completed training on evidence-based, 20            trauma-informed, victim-centered responses to 21            cases of sexual assault and sexual abuse and shall 22            have experience responding to sexual assault and 23            sexual abuse cases.24                (iii) The Illinois State Police shall adopt 25            rules, in consultation with the Office of the 26            Attorney General and the Illinois Law Enforcement   HB5468- 11 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1            Training Standards Board, to determine the 2            specific training requirements. The rules adopted 3            by the Illinois State Police shall include, at a 4            minimum, both of the following:5                    (a) evidence-based curriculum standards 6                for report writing and immediate response to 7                sexual assault and sexual abuse, including 8                trauma-informed, victim-centered interview 9                techniques, which have been demonstrated to 10                minimize retraumatization, for all Illinois 11                State Police officers; and12                    (b) evidence-based curriculum standards 13                for trauma-informed, victim-centered 14                investigation and interviewing techniques, 15                which have been demonstrated to minimize 16                retraumatization, for cases of sexual assault 17                and sexual abuse for all Illinois State Police 18                officers who conduct sexual assault and sexual 19                abuse investigations.20        (4) At least every 5 years, the Division of the 21    Academy and Training shall provide the following 22    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:23            (A) Psychology of domestic violence; training. 24        Training under this subparagraph (A) shall provide aid 25        in understanding the actions of domestic violence 26        victims and abusers and the actions needed to prevent   HB5468- 12 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        further victimization of those who have been abused. 2        The training shall focus specifically on looking 3        beyond physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 4        violence situations by studying the dynamics of the 5        aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 6        claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 7        assessing the long-term effects of domestic violence 8        situations.9    (c-10) Cadet training. The Division of the Academy and 10Training shall provide the following basic training to 11Illinois State Police cadets or ensure the following training 12was completed prior to an Illinois State Police cadet becoming 13an Illinois State Police officer:14        (1) Animal fighting awareness and humane response; 15    training. Training required under this paragraph (1) shall 16    include a training program in animal fighting awareness 17    and humane response for Illinois State Police cadets. The 18    purpose of that training shall be for Illinois State 19    Police officers to identify animal fighting operations and 20    respond appropriately. Training under this paragraph (1) 21    shall include a humane response component that provides 22    guidelines for appropriate law enforcement response to 23    animal abuse, cruelty, and neglect, or similar condition, 24    as well as training on canine behavior and nonlethal ways 25    to subdue a canine.26        (2) Arrest and use of force and control tactics and   HB5468- 13 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    officer safety; training. Training required under this 2    paragraph (2) must include, without limitation, training 3    on officer safety techniques, such as cover, concealment, 4    and time.5        (3) Arrest of a parent or an immediate family member; 6    training. Training required under this paragraph (3) shall 7    instruct Illinois State Police cadets on trauma-informed 8    responses designed to ensure the physical safety and 9    well-being of a child of an arrested parent or immediate 10    family member, which must include, without limitation: (A) 11    training in understanding the trauma experienced by the 12    child while maintaining the integrity of the arrest and 13    safety of officers, suspects, and other involved 14    individuals; (B) training in de-escalation tactics that 15    would include the use of force when reasonably necessary; 16    and (C) training in understanding and inquiring whether a 17    child will require supervision and care.18        (4) Autism and other developmental or physical 19    disabilities; training. Training required under this 20    paragraph (4) shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets 21    on identifying and interacting with persons with autism 22    and other developmental or physical disabilities, reducing 23    barriers to reporting crimes against persons with autism, 24    and addressing the unique challenges presented by cases 25    involving victims or witnesses with autism and other 26    developmental disabilities.  HB5468- 14 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        (5) Cell phone medical information; training. Training 2    required under this paragraph (5) shall instruct Illinois 3    State Police cadets to access and use medical information 4    stored in cell phones. The Division of the Academy and 5    Training may use the program approved under Section 6    2310-711 of the Department of Public Health Powers and 7    Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to 8    develop the training required under this paragraph (5). 9        (6) Compliance with the Health Care Violence 10    Prevention Act; training. Training required under this 11    paragraph (6) shall provide an appropriate level of 12    training for Illinois State Police cadets concerning the 13    Health Care Violence Prevention Act.14        (7) Constitutional law; training. Training required 15    under this paragraph (7) shall instruct Illinois State 16    Police cadets on constitutional and proper use of law 17    enforcement authority, procedural justice, civil rights, 18    human rights, and cultural competency, including implicit 19    bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity.20        (8) Courtroom testimony; training.21        (9) Crime victims; training. Training required under 22    this paragraph (9) shall provide instruction in techniques 23    designed to promote effective communication at the initial 24    contact with crime victims and to comprehensively explain 25    to victims and witnesses their rights under the Rights of 26    Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims   HB5468- 15 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    Compensation Act.2        (10) Criminal law; training.3        (11) Crisis intervention team and mental health 4    awareness; training. Training required under this 5    paragraph (11) shall include a specialty certification 6    course of at least 40 hours, addressing specialized 7    policing responses to people with mental illnesses. The 8    Division of the Academy and Training shall conduct Crisis 9    Intervention Team training programs that train officers to 10    identify signs and symptoms of mental illness, to 11    de-escalate situations involving individuals who appear to 12    have a mental illness and connect individuals in crisis to 13    treatment. The training shall also include an overview of 14    the Community Emergency Services and Support Act. 15        (12) Cultural diversity; training.16            (A) The training required under this paragraph 17        (12) shall provide training to Illinois State Police 18        cadets concerning cultural competency and cultural 19        diversity, including sensitivity toward racial and 20        ethnic differences.21            (B) This training shall include, but not be 22        limited to, an emphasis on the fact that the primary 23        purpose of enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code is 24        safety, equal, and uniform and non-discriminatory 25        enforcement under the law.26        (13) De-escalation and use of force; training.   HB5468- 16 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    Training required under this paragraph (13) must consist 2    of at least 6 hours of instruction on use of force 3    techniques, including the use of de-escalation techniques 4    to prevent or reduce the need for force whenever safe and 5    feasible.6        (14) Domestic violence; training. Training required 7    under this paragraph (14) shall provide aid in 8    understanding the actions of domestic violence victims and 9    abusers and to prevent further victimization of those who 10    have been abused, focusing specifically on looking beyond 11    the physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 12    violence situations, such as the dynamics of the 13    aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 14    claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 15    long-term effects.16        (15) Effective recognition of and responses to stress, 17    trauma, and post-traumatic stress; training. Training 18    required under this paragraph (15) shall instruct Illinois 19    State Police cadets to recognize and respond to stress, 20    trauma, and post-traumatic stress experienced by law 21    enforcement officers. The training must be consistent with 22    Section 25 of the Illinois Mental Health First Aid 23    Training Act in a peer setting, including recognizing 24    signs and symptoms of work-related cumulative stress, 25    issues that may lead to suicide, and solutions for 26    intervention with peer support resources.  HB5468- 17 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        (16) Elder abuse; training. Training required under 2    this paragraph (16) shall teach Illinois State Police 3    cadets to recognize neglect and financial exploitation 4    against the elderly and adults with disabilities. The 5    training shall also teach Illinois State Police cadets to 6    recognize self-neglect by the elderly and adults with 7    disabilities. In this subparagraph, "adults with 8    disabilities" has the meaning given to that term in the 9    Adult Protective Services Act.10        (17) Electronic control devices; training. Training 11    required under this paragraph (17) shall include training 12    in the use of electronic control devices, including the 13    psychological and physiological effects of the use of 14    those devices on humans.15        (18) Epinephrine auto-injector administration; 16    training. Training required under this paragraph (18) 17    shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to recognize 18    and respond to anaphylaxis. The training must comply with 19    subsection (c) of Section 40 of the Illinois State Police 20    Act.21        (19) Evidence collection; training. Training required 22    under this paragraph (19) must include proper procedures 23    for collecting, handling, and preserving evidence, and 24    rules of law.25        (20) Firearms restraining orders; training. Providing 26    instruction on the process used to file a firearms   HB5468- 18 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    restraining order and how to identify situations in which 2    a firearms restraining order is appropriate and how to 3    safely promote the usage of the firearms restraining order 4    in different situations.5        (21) Firearms; training. Successful completion of a 6    40-hour course of training in use of a suitable type 7    firearm shall be a condition precedent to the possession 8    and use of that respective firearm in connection with the 9    officer's official duties. To satisfy the requirements of 10    this Act, the training must include the following:11            (A) Instruction in the dangers of misuse of the 12        firearm, safety rules, and care and cleaning of the 13        firearm.14            (B) Practice firing on a range and qualification 15        with the firearm in accordance with the standards 16        established by the Board.17            (C) Instruction in the legal use of firearms under 18        the Criminal Code of 2012 and relevant court 19        decisions.20            (D) A forceful presentation of the ethical and 21        moral considerations assumed by any person who uses a 22        firearm.23        (22) First-aid; training. First-aid training must 24    include cardiopulmonary resuscitation.25        (23) Hate crimes; training. Training required under 26    this paragraph (23) shall instruct Illinois State Police   HB5468- 19 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    cadets in identifying, responding to, and reporting all 2    hate crimes.3        (24) High-risk traffic stops; training. Training 4    required under this paragraph (24) must consist of at 5    least 6 hours of training focused on high-risk traffic 6    stops.7        (25) High-speed vehicle chase; training. Training 8    required under this paragraph (25) shall instruct Illinois 9    State Police cadets on the hazards of high-speed police 10    vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to the 11    high-speed vehicle chase.12        (26) Human relations; training.13        (27) Human trafficking; training. Training required 14    under this paragraph (27) shall instruct Illinois State 15    Police cadets in the detection and investigation of all 16    forms of human trafficking, including, but not limited to, 17    involuntary servitude under subsection (b) of Section 10-9 18    of the Criminal Code of 2012, involuntary sexual servitude 19    of a minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of the 20    Criminal Code of 2012, and trafficking in persons under 21    subsection (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 22    2012. This program shall be made available to all cadets 23    and Illinois State Police officers.24        (28) Juvenile law; training. Training required under 25    this paragraph (28) shall instruct Illinois State Police 26    cadets on juvenile law and the proper processing and   HB5468- 20 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    handling of juvenile offenders.2        (29) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 3    under this paragraph (29) must be approved by the 4    Department of Children and Family Services as provided 5    under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 6    Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting of 7    child abuse and neglect.8        (30) Mental conditions and crises, training. Training 9    required under this paragraph (30) shall include, without 10    limitation, (A) recognizing the disease of addiction, (B) 11    recognizing situations which require immediate assistance, 12    and (C) responding in a manner that safeguards and 13    provides assistance to individuals in need of mental 14    treatment.15        (31) Officer wellness and suicide prevention; 16    training. The training required under this paragraph (31) 17    shall include instruction on job-related stress management 18    techniques, skills for recognizing signs and symptoms of 19    work-related cumulative stress, recognition of other 20    issues that may lead to officer suicide, solutions for 21    intervention, and a presentation on available peer support 22    resources.23        (32) Officer-worn body cameras; training.24            (A) As used in this paragraph (32), "officer-worn 25        body camera" has the meaning given to that term in 26        Article 10 of the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body   HB5468- 21 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        Camera Act.2            (B) The training required under this paragraph 3        (32) shall provide training in the use of officer-worn 4        body cameras to cadets who will use officer-worn body 5        cameras.6        (33) Opioid antagonists; training.7            (A) As used in this paragraph (33), "opioid 8        antagonist" has the meaning given to that term in 9        subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the Substance Use 10        Disorder Act.11            (B) Training required under this paragraph (33) 12        shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to 13        administer opioid antagonists.14        (34) Persons arrested while under the influence of 15    alcohol or drugs; training. Training required under this 16    paragraph (34) shall comply with Illinois State Police 17    policy adopted under Section 2605-54. The training shall 18    be consistent with the Substance Use Disorder Act and 19    shall provide guidance for the arrest of persons under the 20    influence of alcohol or drugs, proper medical attention if 21    warranted, and care and release of those persons from 22    custody. The training shall provide guidance concerning 23    the release of persons arrested under the influence of 24    alcohol or drugs who are under the age of 21 years of age, 25    which shall include, but shall not be limited to, 26    instructions requiring the arresting officer to make a   HB5468- 22 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    reasonable attempt to contact a responsible adult who is 2    willing to take custody of the person who is under the 3    influence of alcohol or drugs.4        (35) Physical training.5        (36) Post-traumatic stress disorder; training. 6    Training required under this paragraph (36) shall equip 7    Illinois State Police cadets to identify the symptoms of 8    post-traumatic stress disorder and to respond 9    appropriately to individuals exhibiting those symptoms.10        (37) Report writing; training. Training required under 11    this paragraph (37) shall instruct Illinois State Police 12    cadets on writing reports and proper documentation of 13    statements.14        (38) Scenario training. At least 12 hours of hands-on, 15    scenario-based role-playing.16        (39) Search and seizure; training. Training required 17    under this paragraph (39) shall instruct Illinois State 18    Police cadets on search and seizure, including temporary 19    questioning.20        (40) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training. 21    Training required under this paragraph (40) shall instruct 22    Illinois State Police cadets on sexual assault and sexual 23    abuse response and report writing training requirements, 24    including, but not limited to, the following:25            (A) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;26            (B) understanding the role trauma has played in a   HB5468- 23 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        victim's life;2            (C) responding to the needs and concerns of a 3        victim;4            (D) delivering services in a compassionate, 5        sensitive, and nonjudgmental manner;6            (E) interviewing techniques in accordance with the 7        curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 8        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act;9            (F) understanding cultural perceptions and common 10        myths of sexual assault and sexual abuse; and11            (G) report-writing techniques in accordance with 12        the curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 13        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act and the 14        Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.15        (41) Traffic control and crash investigation; 16    training. 17    (d) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 18administer and conduct a program consistent with 18 U.S.C. 19926B and 926C for qualified active and retired Illinois State 20Police officers. 21(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-939, eff. 1-1-25; 22103-949, eff. 1-1-25; 104-24, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 238-15-25; revised 1-29-26.) 24    Section 10. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 25changing Section 10.17 as follows:   HB5468- 24 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    (50 ILCS 705/10.17)2    Sec. 10.17. Crisis Intervention Team (CIT) training; 3mental health awareness training; certified therapy dog team 4training and certification.5    (a) The Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 6shall develop and approve a standard curriculum for certified 7training programs in crisis intervention, including a 8specialty certification course of at least 40 hours, 9addressing specialized policing responses to people with 10mental illnesses. The Board shall conduct Crisis Intervention 11Team (CIT) training programs that train officers to identify 12signs and symptoms of mental illness, to de-escalate 13situations involving individuals who appear to have a mental 14illness, and connect that person in crisis to treatment. 15Crisis Intervention Team (CIT) training programs shall be a 16collaboration between law enforcement professionals, mental 17health providers, families, and consumer advocates and must 18minimally include the following components: (1) basic 19information about mental illnesses and how to recognize them; 20(2) information about mental health laws and resources; (3) 21learning from family members of individuals with mental 22illness and their experiences; and (4) verbal de-escalation 23training and role-plays; and (5) community response options 24including, the community response options under the Community 25Emergency Services and Support Act. Officers who have   HB5468- 25 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1successfully completed this program shall be issued a 2certificate attesting to their attendance of a Crisis 3Intervention Team (CIT) training program.4    (b) The Board shall create an introductory course 5incorporating adult learning models that provides law 6enforcement officers with an awareness of mental health issues 7including a history of the mental health system, types of 8mental health illness including signs and symptoms of mental 9illness and common treatments and medications, and the 10potential interactions law enforcement officers may have on a 11regular basis with these individuals, their families, and 12service providers including de-escalating a potential crisis 13situation. This course, in addition to other traditional 14learning settings, may be made available in an electronic 15format. 16    (c) The Board shall develop a course and certification 17program for certified therapy dog teams consisting of officers 18employing the use of therapy dogs in relation to crisis and 19emergency response. This program shall aim to ensure that 20Crisis Intervention Team (CIT) officers and therapy dog teams 21are available in various regions throughout the State to be 22dispatched in the event of a crisis.23    (d) The Board may include model policies regarding 24community response procedures on its website and may 25distribute educational and training materials created in 26consultation with the Department of Human Services to law   HB5468- 26 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1enforcement agencies throughout the State.2    The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public Act 3101-652 shall take effect January 1, 2022. 4(Source: P.A. 104-106, eff. 1-1-26.) 5    Section 15. The Emergency Telephone System Act is amended 6by changing Section 2 and by adding Sections 7.2 and 7.3 as 7follows: 8    (50 ILCS 750/2)  (from Ch. 134, par. 32)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2027)10    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 11context otherwise requires: 12    "9-1-1 network" means the network used for the delivery of 139-1-1 calls and messages over dedicated and redundant 14facilities to a primary or backup 9-1-1 PSAP that meets the 15appropriate grade of service. 16    "9-1-1 system" means the geographic area that has been 17granted an order of authority by the Commission or the 18Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator to use "9-1-1" as the primary 19emergency telephone number, including, but not limited to, the 20network, software applications, databases, CPE components and 21operational and management procedures required to provide 229-1-1 service. 23    "9-1-1 Authority" means an Emergency Telephone System 24Board or Joint Emergency Telephone System Board that provides   HB5468- 27 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1for the management and operation of a 9-1-1 system. "9-1-1 2Authority" includes the Illinois State Police only to the 3extent it provides 9-1-1 services under this Act.4    "9-1-1 System Manager" means the manager, director, 5administrator, or coordinator who at the direction of his or 6her Emergency Telephone System Board is responsible for the 7implementation and execution of the order of authority issued 8by the Commission or the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator through 9the programs, policies, procedures, and daily operations of 10the 9-1-1 system consistent with the provisions of this Act. 11    "Administrator" means the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator.12    "Advanced service" means any telecommunications service 13with or without dynamic bandwidth allocation, including, but 14not limited to, ISDN Primary Rate Interface (PRI), that, 15through the use of a DS-1, T-1, or other un-channelized or 16multi-channel transmission facility, is capable of 17transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 18telecommunications services to the public switched network or 19the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency.20    "Aggregator" means an entity that ingresses 9-1-1 calls of 21multiple traffic types or 9-1-1 calls from multiple 22originating service providers and combines them on a trunk 23group or groups (or equivalent egress connection arrangement 24to a 9-1-1 system provider's NG9-1-1 network or system), and 25that uses the routing information provided in the received 26call setup signaling to select the appropriate trunk group and   HB5468- 28 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1proceeds to signal call setup toward the 9-1-1 system 2provider. "Aggregator" includes an originating service 3provider that provides aggregation functions for its own 9-1-1 4calls. "Aggregator" also includes an aggregation network or an 5aggregation entity that provides aggregator services for other 6types of system providers, such as cloud-based services or 7enterprise networks as its client. 8    "ALI" or "automatic location identification" means the 9automatic display at the public safety answering point of the 10address or location of the caller's telephone and 11supplementary emergency services information of the location 12from which a call originates.13    "ANI" or "automatic number identification" means the 14automatic display of the 10-digit telephone number associated 15with the caller's telephone number.16    "Automatic alarm" and "automatic alerting device" mean any 17device that will access the 9-1-1 system for emergency 18services upon activation and does not provide for two-way 19communication.20    "Answering point" means a PSAP, SAP, Backup PSAP, Unmanned 21Backup Answering Point, or VAP.22    "Authorized entity" means an answering point or 23participating agency other than a decommissioned PSAP. 24    "Backup PSAP" means an answering point that meets the 25appropriate standards of service and serves as an alternate to 26the PSAP operating independently from the PSAP at a different   HB5468- 29 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1location that has the capability to direct dispatch for the 2PSAP or otherwise transfer emergency calls directly to an 3authorized entity. A backup PSAP may accept overflow calls 4from the PSAP or be activated if the primary PSAP is disabled. 5    "Board" means an Emergency Telephone System Board or a 6Joint Emergency Telephone System Board created pursuant to 7Section 15.4.8    "Bylaws" means a set of regulations that ensure consistent 9and agreed upon voting and decision-making procedures. 10    "Call back number" means a number used by a PSAP to 11recontact a location from which a 9-1-1 call was placed, 12regardless of whether that number is a direct-dial number for 13a station used to originate a 9-1-1 call. 14    "Carrier" includes a telecommunications carrier and a 15wireless carrier.16    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.17    "Computer aided dispatch" or "CAD" means a computer-based 18system that aids public safety telecommunicators or 19telecommunicator supervisors by automating selected 20dispatching and recordkeeping activities.21    "Direct dispatch" means a 9-1-1 service wherein upon 22receipt of an emergency call, a public safety telecommunicator 23or telecommunicator supervisors transmits, without delay, 24transfer, relay, or referral, all relevant available 25information to the appropriate public safety personnel or 26emergency responders.  HB5468- 30 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    "Dispatchable location" means a location delivered to the 2PSAP with a 9-1-1 call that consists of the validated street 3address of the calling party, plus additional information, 4such as a suite or apartment identifier, uncertainty data, or 5similar information, necessary to accurately identify the 6location of the calling party. 7    "Decommissioned" means the revocation of a PSAPs authority 8to handle 9-1-1 calls as an answering point within the 9-1-1 9network. 10    "Diversion" means the obligation or expenditure of a 9-1-1 11fee or charge for a purpose or function other than the purposes 12and functions designated by the Federal Communications 13Commission as acceptable under 47 CFR 9.23. "Diversion" 14includes distribution of a 9-1-1 fee or charge to a political 15subdivision that obligates or expends such fees for a purpose 16or function other than those designated as acceptable by the 17Federal Communications Commission under 47 CFR 9.23. 18    "DS-1, T-1, or similar un-channelized or multi-channel 19transmission facility" means a facility that can transmit and 20receive a bit rate of at least 1.544 megabits per second 21(Mbps).22    "Dynamic bandwidth allocation" means the ability of the 23facility or customer to drop and add channels, or adjust 24bandwidth, when needed in real time for voice or data 25purposes.26    "Emergency call" means any type of request for emergency   HB5468- 31 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1assistance through a 9-1-1 network either to the digits 9-1-1 2or the emergency 24/7 10-digit telephone number for all 3answering points. An emergency call is not limited to a voice 4telephone call. It could be a two-way video call, an 5interactive text, Teletypewriter (TTY), an SMS, an Instant 6Message, or any new mechanism for communications available in 7the future. An emergency call occurs when the request for 8emergency assistance is received by a public safety 9telecommunicator. 10    "Emergency Telephone System Board" or "ETSB" means (i) a 11board appointed by the corporate authorities of any county or 12municipality to provide for the management and operation of a 139-1-1 system within the scope of the duties and powers 14prescribed by this Act or (ii) a joint Emergency Telephone 15System Board. 16    "EMS personnel" has the meaning given to that term in 17Section 3.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 18Act. 19    "First responder" means someone designated by a public 20safety agency who is charged with responding to emergency 21service requests, including emergency communications 22professionals, public safety telecommunicators, public safety 23telecommunicator supervisors, and police, fire, and EMS 24personnel who operate in the field. 25    "Grade of service" means the NENA Baseline NG9-1-1 as set 26forth in the NENA i3 Solution prevailing national standard.   HB5468- 32 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    "Hearing-impaired individual" means a person with a 2permanent hearing loss who can regularly and routinely 3communicate by telephone only through the aid of devices which 4can send and receive written messages over the telephone 5network.6    "Hosted supplemental 9-1-1 service" means a database 7service that:8        (1) electronically provides information for 9-1-1 call 9    takers when a call is placed to 9-1-1;10        (2) allows telephone subscribers to provide 11    information to 9-1-1 to be used in emergency scenarios;12        (3) collects a variety of formatted data relevant to 13    9-1-1 and first responder needs, which may include, but is 14    not limited to, photographs of the telephone subscribers, 15    physical descriptions, medical information, household 16    data, and emergency contacts;17        (4) allows for information to be entered by telephone 18    subscribers through a secure website where they can elect 19    to provide as little or as much information as they 20    choose; 21        (5) automatically displays data provided by telephone 22    subscribers to 9-1-1 call takers for all types of 23    telephones when a call is placed to 9-1-1 from a 24    registered and confirmed phone number;25        (6) (blank);26        (7) (blank);  HB5468- 33 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        (8) (blank);2        (9) supports the delivery of telephone subscriber 3    information through a secure internet connection to all 4    emergency telephone system boards;5        (10) works across all 9-1-1 call-taking equipment and 6    allows for the easy transfer of information into a 7    computer aided dispatch system; and8        (11) may be used to collect information pursuant to an 9    Illinois Premise Alert Program as defined in the Illinois 10    Premise Alert Program (PAP) Act.11    "Interconnected voice service" means a telecommunications 12service that:13        (1) allows users to make and receive calls to and from 14    the public switched telephone network or other phone 15    lines, including both traditional landline and mobile 16    services;17        (2) enables users to make or receive voice calls to or 18    from telephone numbers assigned to the public switched 19    telephone network, including calls to and from emergency 20    services;21        (3) requires a connection to the public switched 22    telephone network (PSTN) either directly or through other 23    interconnected services;24        (4) supports standard telephone functions, such as 25    making and receiving calls, voicemail, and the ability to 26    connect with other telephone networks;  HB5468- 34 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1        (5) complies with various FCC regulations to ensure 2    user safety, including the requirement to support 9-1-1 3    services, allowing emergency responders to locate the 4    caller; and5        (6) can be provided over various technologies, 6    including traditional telephone lines, broadband Internet 7    connections via VoIP, and mobile networks.8    "Interconnected voice service" includes voice over 9Internet protocol (VoIP) services that are integrated into the 10public telephone system and the availability of other 11essential services like number portability and accessibility 12for people with disabilities.13    "Interconnected voice over Internet protocol provider" or 14"Interconnected VoIP provider" has the meaning given to that 15term under Section 13-235 of the Public Utilities Act.16    "Joint Emergency Telephone System Board" or "Joint ETSB" 17means a Joint Emergency Telephone System Board established by 18intergovernmental agreement of two or more municipalities or 19counties, or a combination thereof, to provide for the 20management and operation of a 9-1-1 system.21    "Key telephone system" means a type of MLTS designed to 22provide shared access to several outside lines through buttons 23or keys typically offering identified access lines with direct 24line appearance or termination on a given telephone set. 25    "Local public agency" means any unit of local government 26or special purpose district located in whole or in part within   HB5468- 35 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1this State that provides or has authority to provide 2firefighting, police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency 3services.4    "Mechanical dialer" means any device that accesses the 59-1-1 system without human intervention and does not provide 6for two-way communication.7    "Master Street Address Guide" or "MSAG" is a database of 8street names and house ranges within their associated 9communities defining emergency service zones (ESZs) and their 10associated emergency service numbers (ESNs) to enable proper 11routing of 9-1-1 calls.12    "Mobile telephone number" or "MTN" means the telephone 13number assigned to a wireless telephone at the time of initial 14activation.15    "Multi-line telephone system" or "MLTS" means a system 16composed of common control units, telephone sets, control 17hardware and software, and adjunct systems, including network 18and premises-based systems, such as Centrex and VoIP, as well 19as PBX, hybrid, and key telephone systems (as classified by 20the Federal Communications Commission under 47 CFR Part 68, 21which includes systems owned or leased by governmental 22agencies, nonprofit entities, and for-profit businesses. 23"Multi-line telephone system" or "MLTS" includes the full 24range of networked communication systems that serve 25enterprises, including IP-based and cloud-based systems. 26"Multi-line telephone system" or "MLTS" also includes   HB5468- 36 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1outbound-only MLTS that allow users to make 9-1-1 calls but do 2not enable PSAPs to place a return call directly to the 9-1-1 3caller. 4    "Network connections" means the number of voice grade 5communications channels directly between a subscriber and a 6telecommunications carrier's public switched network, without 7the intervention of any other telecommunications carrier's 8switched network, which would be required to carry the 9subscriber's inter-premises traffic and which connection 10either (1) is capable of providing access through the public 11switched network to a 9-1-1 Emergency Telephone System, if one 12exists, or (2) if no system exists at the time a surcharge is 13imposed under Section 15.3 or 20, that would be capable of 14providing access through the public switched network to the 15local 9-1-1 Emergency Telephone System if one existed. Where 16multiple voice grade communications channels are connected to 17a telecommunications carrier's public switched network through 18a private branch exchange (PBX) service, there shall be 19determined to be one network connection for each trunk line 20capable of transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises 21traffic to the public switched network or the subscriber's 229-1-1 calls to the public agency. Where multiple voice grade 23communications channels are connected to an OSP's public 24switched network through Centrex type service, the number of 25network connections shall be equal to the number of PBX trunk 26equivalents for the subscriber's service or other multiple   HB5468- 37 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1voice grade communication channels facility, as determined by 2reference to any generally applicable exchange access service 3tariff filed by the subscriber's telecommunications carrier 4with the Commission.5    "Network costs" means those recurring costs that directly 6relate to the operation of the 9-1-1 network as determined by 7the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator with the advice of the 8Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board, which may include, but need 9not be limited to, some or all of the following: costs for 10interoffice trunks, selective routing charges, transfer lines 11and toll charges for 9-1-1 services, Automatic Location 12Information (ALI) database charges, independent local exchange 13carrier charges and non-system provider charges, carrier 14charges for third party database for on-site customer premises 15equipment, backup back-up PSAP trunks for non-system 16providers, periodic database updates as provided by carrier 17(also known as "ALI data dump"), regional ALI storage charges, 18circuits for call delivery (fiber or circuit connection), 19NG9-1-1 costs, and all associated fees, taxes, and surcharges 20on each invoice. "Network costs" shall not include radio 21circuits or toll charges that are other than for 9-1-1 22services.23    "Next generation 9-1-1" or "NG9-1-1" means a secure 24Internet Protocol-based (IP-based) open-standards system 25comprised of hardware, software, data, and operational 26policies and procedures that:  HB5468- 38 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1            (A) provides standardized interfaces from 2        emergency call and message services to support 3        emergency communications; 4            (B) processes all types of emergency calls, 5        including voice, text, data, and multimedia 6        information; 7            (C) acquires and integrates additional emergency 8        call data useful to call routing and handling;9            (D) delivers the emergency calls, messages, and 10        data to the appropriate public safety answering point 11        and other appropriate emergency entities based on the 12        location of the caller;13            (E) supports data, video, and other communications 14        needs for coordinated incident response and 15        management; and16            (F) interoperates with services and networks used 17        by first responders to facilitate emergency response. 18    "Next generation 9-1-1 costs" or "NG9-1-1 costs" means 19those recurring costs that directly relate to the next 20generation 9-1-1 service as determined by the Statewide 9-1-1 21Administrator with the advice of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory 22Board, which may include, but need not be limited to, costs for 23NENA i3 Core Components (Border Control Function (BCF), 24Emergency Call Routing Function (ECRF), Location Validation 25Function (LVF), Emergency Services Routing Proxy (ESRP), 26Policy Store/Policy Routing Functions (PSPRF), Location   HB5468- 39 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1Information Servers (LIS)), Statewide ESInet, and software 2external to the PSAP (data collection, identity management, 3aggregation, and GIS functionality).4    "Next generation 9-1-1 core services" or "NGCS" means a 5set of services needed to process a 9-1-1 call on an ESInet. 6"Next generation 9-1-1 core services" or "NGCS" includes, but 7is not limited to, the ESRP, ECRF, LVF, BCF, bridge, policy 8store, logging services, and typical IP services, including 9DNS and DHCP. "Next generation 9-1-1 core services" or "NGCS" 10does not include the network on which the services operate. 11    "Originating service provider" or "OSP" means the entity 12that provides services to end users that may be used to 13originate voice or nonvoice 9-1-1 requests for assistance and 14who would interconnect, in any of various fashions, to the 159-1-1 system provider for purposes of delivering 9-1-1 traffic 16to the public safety answering points. 17    "Primary place of use" or "PPU" means the residential 18street address or the primary business street address where a 19customer primarily uses the mobile telecommunications service. 20"Primary place of use" or "PPU" does not include a post office 21box address.22    "Public agency" means the State, and any unit of local 23government or special purpose district located in whole or in 24part within this State, that provides or has authority to 25provide firefighting, police, ambulance, medical, or other 26emergency services.  HB5468- 40 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    "Public safety agency" means a functional division of a 2public agency that provides firefighting, police, medical, or 3other emergency services to respond to and manage emergency 4incidents. For the purpose of providing wireless service to 5users of 9-1-1 emergency services, as expressly provided for 6in this Act, the Illinois State Police may be considered a 7public safety agency.8    "Public safety answering point" or "PSAP" means the 9primary answering location of an emergency call that meets the 10appropriate standards of service and is responsible for 11receiving and processing those calls and events according to a 12specified operational policy.13    "PSAP representative" means the manager or supervisor of a 14public safety answering point Public Safety Answering Point 15(PSAP) who oversees the daily operational functions and is 16responsible for the overall management and administration of 17the PSAP. 18    "Public safety telecommunicator" means any person employed 19in a full-time or part-time capacity at an answering point 20whose duties or responsibilities include answering, receiving, 21or transferring an emergency call for dispatch to the 22appropriate emergency responder. 23    "Public safety telecommunicator supervisor" means any 24person employed in a full-time or part-time capacity at an 25answering point or by a 9-1-1 Authority, whose primary duties 26or responsibilities are to direct, administer, or manage any   HB5468- 41 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1public safety telecommunicator and whose responsibilities 2include answering, receiving, or transferring an emergency 3call for dispatch to the appropriate emergency responders. 4    "Referral" means a 9-1-1 service in which the public 5safety telecommunicator provides the calling party with the 6telephone number of the appropriate public safety agency or 7other provider of emergency services.8    "Regular service" means any telecommunications service, 9other than advanced service, that is capable of transporting 10either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 11telecommunications services to the public switched network or 12the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency.13    "Relay" means a 9-1-1 service in which the public safety 14telecommunicator takes the pertinent information from a caller 15and relays that information to the appropriate public safety 16agency or other provider of emergency services.17    "Remit period" means the billing period, one month in 18duration, for which a wireless carrier remits a surcharge and 19provides subscriber information by zip code to the Illinois 20State Police, in accordance with Section 20 of this Act.21    "Secondary Answering Point" or "SAP" means a location, 22other than a PSAP, that is able to receive the voice, data, and 23call back number of NG9-1-1 emergency calls transferred from a 24PSAP and completes the call taking process by dispatching 25police, medical, fire, or other emergency responders. 26    "Shared telecommunications services" means the provision   HB5468- 42 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1of telecommunications and information management services and 2equipment within a user group located in discrete private 3premises in building complexes, campuses, or high-rise 4buildings by a commercial shared services provider or by a 5user association, through privately owned customer premises 6equipment and associated data processing and information 7management services. The term "shared telecommunications 8services" includes the provisioning of connections to the 9facilities of a local exchange carrier or an interexchange 10carrier. 11    "Statewide behavioral health crisis system" means the core 12elements or pillars of the crisis system and includes Illinois 139-8-8 Lifeline Contact Centers, community crisis response 14services, including mobile crisis teams, and crisis receiving 15and stabilization facilities and programs, including living 16room programs.17    "Subscriber" means an individual or entity to whom a 18wireless, wireline, or VoIP service account or number has been 19assigned by a carrier, other than an account or number 20associated with prepaid wireless telecommunication service. 21    "System" means the communications equipment, related 22software applications, and databases required to produce a 23response by the appropriate emergency public safety agency or 24other provider of emergency services as a result of an 25emergency call being placed to 9-1-1.26    "System provider" means the contracted entity providing   HB5468- 43 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b19-1-1 network and database services.2    "Telecommunications carrier" means those entities included 3within the definition specified in Section 13-202 of the 4Public Utilities Act, and includes those carriers acting as 5resellers of telecommunications services. "Telecommunications 6carrier" includes telephone systems operating as mutual 7concerns. "Telecommunications carrier" does not include a 8wireless carrier.9    "Telecommunications technology" means equipment that can 10send and receive written messages over the telephone network.11    "Transfer" means a 9-1-1 service in which the public 12safety telecommunicator, who receives an emergency call, 13transmits, redirects, or conferences that call to the 14appropriate public safety agency or other provider of 15emergency services. "Transfer" includes calls transferred, 16within the statewide NG9-1-1 system and to surrounding states 17NG9-1-1 Systems using a SIP URI. "Transfer" shall not include 18(1) a relay or referral of the information without 19transferring the caller or (2) calls transferred to a 10-digit 20number where a SIP URI is available.21    "Transmitting messages" shall have the meaning given to 22that term under Section 8-11-2 of the Illinois Municipal Code.23    "Trunk line" means a transmission path, or group of 24transmission paths, connecting a subscriber's PBX to a 25telecommunications carrier's public switched network. In the 26case of regular service, each voice grade communications   HB5468- 44 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1channel or equivalent amount of bandwidth capable of 2transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 3telecommunications services to the public switched network or 4the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency shall be 5considered a trunk line, even if it is bundled with other 6channels or additional bandwidth. In the case of advanced 7service, each DS-1, T-1, or other un-channelized or 8multi-channel transmission facility that is capable of 9transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 10telecommunications services to the public switched network or 11the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency shall be 12considered a single trunk line, even if it contains multiple 13voice grade communications channels or otherwise supports 2 or 14more voice grade calls at a time; provided, however, that each 15additional increment of up to 24 voice grade channels of 16transmission capacity that is capable of transporting either 17the subscriber's inter-premises voice telecommunications 18services to the public switched network or the subscriber's 199-1-1 calls to the public agency shall be considered an 20additional trunk line.21    "Unmanned backup answering point" means an answering point 22that serves as an alternate to the PSAP at an alternate 23location and is typically unmanned but can be activated if the 24primary PSAP is disabled.25    "Virtual answering point" or "VAP" means a temporary or 26nonpermanent location that is capable of receiving an   HB5468- 45 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1emergency call, contains a fully functional worksite that is 2not bound to a specific location, but rather is portable and 3scalable, connecting public safety telecommunicators to the 4work process, and is capable of completing the call 5dispatching process. 6    "Voice grade Voice-grade call" or "VGC" means a 7telecommunications service that allows for the transmission of 8voice signals with sufficient quality for effective 9communication. 10    "Voice-impaired individual" means a person with a 11permanent speech disability which precludes oral 12communication, who can regularly and routinely communicate by 13telephone only through the aid of devices which can send and 14receive written messages over the telephone network.15    "Wireless" means the delivery of a wireless 9-1-1 call in 16accordance with applicable Federal Communications Commission 17regulations. 18    "Wireless carrier" means a provider of two-way cellular, 19broadband PCS, geographic area 800 MHZ and 900 MHZ Commercial 20Mobile Radio Service (CMRS), Wireless Communications Service 21(WCS), or other Commercial Mobile Radio Service (CMRS), as 22defined by the Federal Communications Commission, offering 23radio communications that may provide fixed, mobile, radio 24location, or satellite communication services to individuals 25or businesses within its assigned spectrum block and 26geographical area or that offers real-time, two-way voice   HB5468- 46 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1service that is interconnected with the public switched 2network, including a reseller of such service.3(Source: P.A. 103-366, eff. 1-1-24; 104-204, eff. 8-15-25; 4revised 12-12-25.) 5    (50 ILCS 750/7.2 new)6    Sec. 7.2. Required compliance with the Community Emergency 7Services and Support Act Protocols. Beginning July 1, 2027, 8all public safety answering points shall comply with the 9protocols established under the Community Emergency Services 10and Support Act. The public safety answering points shall use 11the protocols and processes to identify behavioral and mental 12health-related emergencies that do not require a law 13enforcement response. When appropriate, a public safety 14answering point shall transfer calls that do not require a law 15enforcement response to the statewide behavioral health crisis 16system in accordance with the protocols established under the 17Community Emergency Services and Support Act 18    (50 ILCS 750/7.3 new)19    Sec. 7.3. Monitoring PSAP compliance with the Community 20Emergency Services and Support Act.21    (a) The Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator shall 22ensure that PSAPs comply with the requirements of Section 7.2. 23To ensure that PSAPs comply with the requirements of Section 247.2, the Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator shall   HB5468- 47 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1monitor every PSAP.2    (b) The Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator shall 3consult, as appropriate, with the Illinois Department of Human 4Services to support PSAP compliance with the Community 5Emergency Services and Support Act. In carrying out this 6responsibility, the Illinois Department of Human Services 7shall provide consultation, resources, collaboration, and 8guidance to the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, as appropriate, 9to support PSAP compliance with the Community Emergency 10Services and Support Act. The guidance shall include required 11data elements, reporting formats, and a mechanism for 12reporting provider service data to support monitoring, 13verification, and quality improvement. The Office of the 14Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator shall adopt rules to implement 15this Section and ensure compliance with Section 7.2. 16    Section 20. The Community Emergency Services and Support 17Act is amended by changing Sections 5, 15, 20, 25, 30, 35, 40, 1845, 50, 65, and 70 and by adding Sections 75 and 80 as follows: 19    (50 ILCS 754/5)20    Sec. 5. Findings. The General Assembly recognizes that the 21Illinois Department of Human Services Division of Mental 22Health is preparing to provide mobile mental and behavioral 23health services to all Illinoisans as part of the federally 24mandated adoption of the 9-8-8 phone number. The General   HB5468- 48 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1Assembly also recognizes that many cities and some states have 2successfully established mobile emergency mental and 3behavioral health services as part of their emergency response 4system to support people who need such support and do not 5present a threat of physical violence to the mobile mental 6health relief providers. In light of that experience, the 7General Assembly finds that in order to promote and protect 8the health, safety, and welfare of the public, it is necessary 9and in the public interest to provide emergency response, with 10or without medical transportation, to individuals requiring 11mental health or behavioral health services in a manner that 12is substantially equivalent to the response already provided 13to individuals who require emergency physical health care. 14    The General Assembly also recognizes the history of 15vulnerable populations being subject to unwarranted 16involuntary commitment or other human rights violations 17instead of receiving necessary care during acute crises which 18may contribute to an understandable apprehension of behavioral 19health services among individuals who have historically been 20subject to these practices. The General Assembly intends for 21the Mobile Mental Health Relief Providers regulated by this 22Act to assist with crises that do not rise to the level of 23involuntary commitment. However, the General Assembly also 24recognizes that Mobile Mental Health Relief Providers may, 25during the course of assisting with a crisis, encounter 26individuals who present an imminent threat of injury to   HB5468- 49 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1themselves or others unless they receive assistance through 2the involuntary commitment process. This Act intends to 3balance concerns about misuse of the involuntary commitment 4process with the need for emergency care for individuals whose 5crisis presents an imminent threat of injury. 6(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 104-155, eff. 8-1-25.) 7    (50 ILCS 754/15)8    Sec. 15. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Chemical restraint" means any drug used for discipline or 10convenience and not required to treat medical symptoms.11    "Community services" and "community-based mental or 12behavioral health services" include both public and private 13settings.14    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 15    "Division of Mental Health" means the Division of Mental 16Health of the Department of Human Services.17    "Emergency" means an emergent circumstance caused by a 18health condition, regardless of whether it is perceived as 19physical, mental, or behavioral in nature, for which an 20individual may require prompt care, support, or assessment at 21the individual's location. 22    "Mental or behavioral health" means any health condition 23involving changes in thinking, emotion, or behavior, and that 24the medical community treats as distinct from physical health 25care.  HB5468- 50 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    "Mobile mental health relief provider" means a mobile 2crisis response team or a mental health professional, as 3defined by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 4who engages with individuals person engaging with a member of 5the public to provide the mobile mental and behavioral health 6services service established in conjunction with the 7Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health 8establishing the 9-8-8 emergency number. "Mobile mental health 9relief provider" may include paramedics does not include a 10Paramedic (EMT-P), emergency medical technicians (EMTs), other 11medical personnel; individuals with lived experience; or 12community responders who are trained to provide mobile 13behavioral health crisis services or EMT, as those terms are 14defined in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act, 15unless that responding agency has agreed to provide a 16specialized response in accordance with the Division of Mental 17Health's services offered through its 9-8-8 number and has met 18all the requirements to offer that service through that 19system. 20    "Physical health" means a health condition that the 21medical community treats as distinct from mental or behavioral 22health care.23    "Physical restraint" means any manual method or physical 24or mechanical device, material, or equipment attached or 25adjacent to an individual's body that the individual cannot 26easily remove and restricts freedom of movement or normal   HB5468- 51 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1access to one's body. "Physical restraint" does not include a 2seat belt if it is used during transportation of an individual 3and the individual has access to the mechanism that releases 4the seat belt.5    "Public safety answering point" or "PSAP" means the 6primary answering location of an emergency call that meets the 7appropriate standards of service and is responsible for 8receiving and processing those calls and events according to a 9specified operational policy.10    "Treatment relationship" means an active association with 11a mental or behavioral care provider able to respond in an 12appropriate amount of time to requests for care.13(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 104-155, eff. 8-1-25.) 14    (50 ILCS 754/20)15    Sec. 20. Coordination with the Department Division of 16Mental Health. Each 9-1-1 PSAP and provider of emergency 17services dispatched through a 9-1-1 system must coordinate 18with the mobile mental and behavioral health services 19established by the Department Division of Mental Health so 20that the following State goals and State prohibitions are met 21whenever a person interacts with one of these entities for the 22purpose of seeking emergency mental and behavioral health care 23or when one of these entities recognizes the appropriateness 24of providing mobile mental or behavioral health care to an 25individual with whom they have engaged. The Department   HB5468- 52 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1Division of Mental Health is also directed to provide guidance 2regarding whether and how these entities should coordinate 3with mobile mental and behavioral health services when 4responding to individuals who appear to be in a mental or 5behavioral health emergency while engaged in conduct alleged 6to constitute a non-violent misdemeanor.7(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.) 8    (50 ILCS 754/25)9    Sec. 25. State goals. 10    (a) 9-1-1 PSAPs, emergency services dispatched through 119-1-1 PSAPs, and the mobile mental and behavioral health 12service established by the Department Division of Mental 13Health must coordinate their services so that the State goals 14listed in this Section are achieved. Appropriate mobile 15response service for mental and behavioral health emergencies 16shall be available regardless of whether the initial contact 17was with 9-8-8, with 9-1-1, or directly with an emergency 18service dispatched through 9-1-1. Appropriate mobile response 19services must:20        (1) whenever possible, ensure that individuals 21    experiencing mental or behavioral health crises are 22    diverted from hospitalization or incarceration and are 23    instead linked with available appropriate community 24    services; 25        (2) include the option of on-site care if that type of   HB5468- 53 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    care is appropriate and does not override the care 2    decisions of the individual receiving care. Providing care 3    in the community, through methods like mobile crisis 4    units, is encouraged. If effective care is provided on 5    site, and if it is consistent with the care decisions of 6    the individual receiving the care, further transportation 7    to other medical providers is not required by this Act;8        (3) recommend appropriate referrals for available 9    community services if the individual receiving on-site 10    care is not already in a treatment relationship with a 11    service provider or is unsatisfied with their current 12    service providers. The referrals shall take into 13    consideration waiting lists and copayments, which may 14    present barriers to access; and 15        (4) subject to the care decisions of the individual 16    receiving care, coordinate transportation for any 17    individual experiencing a mental or behavioral health 18    emergency to the most integrated and least restrictive 19    setting feasible. A mobile crisis response team may 20    provide transportation if the mobile crisis response team 21    is appropriately equipped and staffed to do so.22    (b) Prioritize requests for emergency assistance. 9-1-1 23PSAPs, emergency services dispatched through 9-1-1 PSAPs, and 24the mobile mental and behavioral health service established by 25the Department Division of Mental Health must provide guidance 26for prioritizing calls for assistance and maximum response   HB5468- 54 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1time in relation to the type of emergency reported.2    (c) Provide appropriate response times. From the time of 3first notification, 9-1-1 PSAPs, emergency services dispatched 4through 9-1-1 PSAPs, and the mobile mental and behavioral 5health service established by the Department Division of 6Mental Health must provide the response within a response time 7appropriate to the care requirements of the individual with an 8emergency.9    (d) Require appropriate mobile mental health relief 10provider training. Mobile mental health relief providers must 11have adequate training to address the needs of individuals 12experiencing a mental or behavioral health emergency. Adequate 13training at least includes:14        (1) training in de-escalation techniques;15        (2) knowledge of local community services and 16    supports; 17        (3) training in respectful interaction with people 18    experiencing mental or behavioral health crises, including 19    the concepts of stigma and respectful language;20        (4) training in recognizing and working with people 21    with neurodivergent and developmental disability diagnoses 22    and in the techniques available to help stabilize and 23    connect them to further services; and24        (5) training in the involuntary commitment process, in 25    identification of situations that meet the standards for 26    involuntary commitment, and in cultural competencies and   HB5468- 55 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    social biases to guard against any group being 2    disproportionately subjected to the involuntary commitment 3    process or the use of the process not warranted under the 4    legal standard for involuntary commitment. 5    (e) Require minimum team staffing. The Department Division 6of Mental Health, in consultation with the Regional Advisory 7Committees created in Section 40, shall determine the 8appropriate credentials for the mental health providers 9responding to calls, including to what extent the mobile 10mental health relief providers must have certain credentials 11and licensing, and to what extent the mobile mental health 12relief providers can be peer support professionals.13    (f) Require training from individuals with lived 14experience. Training shall be provided by individuals with 15lived experience to the extent available.16    (g) Adopt guidelines directing referral to restrictive 17care settings. Mobile mental health relief providers must have 18guidelines to follow when considering whether to refer an 19individual to more restrictive forms of care, like emergency 20room or hospital settings.21    (h) Specify regional best practices. Mobile mental health 22relief providers providing these services must do so 23consistently with best practices, which include respecting the 24care choices of the individuals receiving assistance. Regional 25best practices may be broken down into sub-regions, as 26appropriate to reflect local resources and conditions. With   HB5468- 56 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1the agreement of the impacted EMS Regions, providers of 2emergency response to physical emergencies may participate in 3another EMS Region for mental and behavioral response, if that 4participation shall provide a better service to individuals 5experiencing a mental or behavioral health emergency. 6    (i) Adopt a system for directing care in advance of an 7emergency. The Department Division of Mental Health shall 8select and publicly identify a system that allows individuals 9who voluntarily chose to do so to provide confidential 10advanced care directions to individuals providing services 11under this Act. No system for providing advanced care 12direction may be implemented unless the Department Division of 13Mental Health approves it as confidential, available to 14individuals at all economic levels, and non-stigmatizing. The 15Department Division of Mental Health may defer this 16requirement for providing a system for advanced care direction 17if it determines that no existing systems can currently meet 18these requirements. 19    (j) Train dispatching staff. The personnel staffing 9-1-1, 203-1-1, or other emergency response intake systems must be 21provided with adequate training to assess whether coordinating 22with 9-8-8 is appropriate.23    (k) Establish protocol for emergency responder 24coordination. The Department Division of Mental Health shall 25establish a protocol for mobile mental health relief 26providers, law enforcement, and fire and ambulance services to   HB5468- 57 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1request assistance from each other, and train these groups on 2the protocol.3    (l) Integrate law enforcement. The Department Division of 4Mental Health shall provide for law enforcement to request 5mobile mental health relief provider assistance whenever law 6enforcement engages an individual appropriate for services 7under this Act. If law enforcement would typically request EMS 8assistance when it encounters an individual with a physical 9health emergency, law enforcement shall similarly dispatch 10mental or behavioral health personnel or medical 11transportation when it encounters an individual in a mental or 12behavioral health emergency.13    (m) 9-1-1 PSAPs shall screen specific types of law 14enforcement calls and follow approved protocols and processes 15under this Act to identify callers experiencing behavioral 16health crises and refer them for a behavioral health response.17    (n) 9-1-1 PSAPs shall open and follow the emergency 18medical dispatch protocols established under the Emergency 19Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act at the start of all 20emergency calls when appropriate to ensure the protocols are 21used and applied consistently and uniformly to ensure that 22information related to behavioral health emergency calls is 23available for data collection and can be used to determine 24which calls should be referred for a behavioral health 25response.26    (o) PSAP telecommunicators, 9-8-8 crisis counselors, and   HB5468- 58 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1mobile mental health relief providers shall complete training 2necessary to support the implementation of this Act, as 3approved by the Department or the Department's designee.4    (p) 9-1-1 PSAPs, 9-8-8 providers, and mobile mental health 5relief providers shall provide required data using the format 6and data definitions specified by the Department. The 7information may be used to evaluate implementation, evaluate 8quality assurance and improvement efforts, and monitor 9compliance with this Act. 10(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 104-155, eff. 8-1-25; 11revised 12-12-25.) 12    (50 ILCS 754/30)13    Sec. 30. State prohibitions. 9-1-1 PSAPs, emergency 14services dispatched through 9-1-1 PSAPs, and the mobile mental 15and behavioral health service established by the Department 16Division of Mental Health must coordinate their services so 17that, based on the information provided to them, the following 18State prohibitions are avoided: 19    (a) Law enforcement responsibility for providing mental 20and behavioral health care. In any area where mobile mental 21health relief providers are available for dispatch, law 22enforcement shall not be dispatched to respond to an 23individual requiring mental or behavioral health care unless 24that individual is (i) involved in a suspected violation of 25the criminal laws of this State, or (ii) presents a threat of   HB5468- 59 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1physical injury to self or others. Mobile mental health relief 2providers are not considered available for dispatch under this 3Section if 9-8-8 reports that it cannot dispatch appropriate 4service within the maximum response times established by each 5Regional Advisory Committee under Section 45.6        (1) Standing on its own or in combination with each 7    other, the fact that an individual is experiencing a 8    mental or behavioral health emergency, or has a mental 9    health, behavioral health, or other diagnosis, is not 10    sufficient to justify an assessment that the individual is 11    a threat of physical injury to self or others, or requires 12    a law enforcement response to a request for emergency 13    response or medical transportation.14        (2) If, based on its assessment of the threat to 15    public safety, law enforcement would not accompany medical 16    transportation responding to a physical health emergency, 17    unless requested by mobile mental health relief providers, 18    law enforcement may not accompany emergency response or 19    medical transportation personnel responding to a mental or 20    behavioral health emergency that presents an equivalent 21    level of threat to self or public safety. 22        (3) Without regard to an assessment of threat to self 23    or threat to public safety, law enforcement may station 24    personnel so that they can rapidly respond to requests for 25    assistance from mobile mental health relief providers if 26    law enforcement does not interfere with the provision of   HB5468- 60 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    emergency response or transportation services. To the 2    extent practical, not interfering with services includes 3    remaining sufficiently distant from or out of sight of the 4    individual receiving care so that law enforcement presence 5    is unlikely to escalate the emergency.6    (b) Mobile mental health relief provider involvement in 7involuntary commitment. Mobile mental health relief providers 8may participate in the involuntary commitment process only to 9the extent permitted under the Mental Health and Developmental 10Disabilities Code. The Department Division of Behavioral 11Health shall, in consultation with each Regional Advisory 12Committee, as appropriate, monitor the use of involuntary 13commitment under this Act and provide systemic recommendations 14to improve outcomes for those subject to commitment.15    (c) Use of law enforcement for transportation. In any area 16where mobile mental health relief providers are available for 17dispatch, unless requested by mobile mental health relief 18providers, law enforcement shall not be used to provide 19transportation to access mental or behavioral health care, or 20travel between mental or behavioral health care providers, 21except where (i) no alternative is available; (ii) the 22individual requests transportation from law enforcement and 23law enforcement mutually agrees to provide transportation; or 24(iii) the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code 25requires or permits law enforcement to provide transportation.26    (d) Reduction of educational institution obligations. The   HB5468- 61 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1services coordinated under this Act may not be used to replace 2any service an educational institution is required to provide 3to a student. It shall not substitute for appropriate special 4education and related services that schools are required to 5provide by any law.6    (e) This Section is operative beginning on the date the 3 7conditions in Section 65 are met or July 1, 2025, whichever is 8earlier.9(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 103-645, eff. 7-1-24; 10104-155, eff. 8-1-25.) 11    (50 ILCS 754/35)12    Sec. 35. Non-violent misdemeanors. The Department's 13Division of Mental Health's Guidance for 9-1-1 PSAPs and 14emergency services dispatched through 9-1-1 PSAPs for 15coordinating the response to individuals who appear to be in a 16mental or behavioral health emergency while engaging in 17conduct alleged to constitute a non-violent misdemeanor shall 18promote the following:19        (a) Prioritization of Health Care. To the greatest 20    extent practicable, community-based mental or behavioral 21    health services should be provided before addressing law 22    enforcement objectives.23        (b) Diversion from Further Criminal Justice 24    Involvement. To the greatest extent practicable, 25    individuals should be referred to health care services   HB5468- 62 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    with the potential to reduce the likelihood of further law 2    enforcement engagement and referral to a pre-arrest or 3    pre-booking case management unit should be prioritized in 4    any areas served by pre-arrest or pre-booking case 5    management. 6(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.) 7    (50 ILCS 754/40)8    Sec. 40. Statewide Advisory Committee. 9    (a) The Department Division of Mental Health shall 10establish a Statewide Advisory Committee to review and make 11recommendations for aspects of coordinating 9-1-1 and the 129-8-8 mobile mental health response system most appropriately 13addressed on a State level.14    (b) Issues to be addressed by the Statewide Advisory 15Committee include, but are not limited to, addressing changes 16necessary in 9-1-1 call taking protocols and scripts used in 179-1-1 PSAPs where those protocols and scripts are based on or 18otherwise dependent on national providers for their operation. 19    (c) The Statewide Advisory Committee shall recommend a 20system for gathering data related to the coordination of the 219-1-1 and 9-8-8 systems for purposes of allowing the parties 22to make ongoing improvements in that system. As practical, the 23system shall attempt to determine issues, which may include, 24but are not limited to:25        (1) the volume of calls coordinated between 9-1-1 and   HB5468- 63 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    9-8-8;2        (2) the volume of referrals from other first 3    responders to 9-8-8;4        (3) the volume and type of calls deemed appropriate 5    for referral to 9-8-8 but could not be served by 9-8-8 6    because of capacity restrictions or other reasons;7        (4) the appropriate information to improve 8    coordination between 9-1-1 and 9-8-8;9        (5) the appropriate information to improve the 9-8-8 10    system, if the information is most appropriately gathered 11    at the 9-1-1 PSAPs; and12        (6) the number of instances of mobile mental health 13    relief providers initiating petitions for involuntary 14    commitment, broken down by county and contracting entity 15    employing the petitioning mobile mental health relief 16    providers and the aggregate demographic data of the 17    individuals subject to those petitions. 18    (d) The Statewide Advisory Committee shall consist of:19        (1) the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, ex officio;20        (2) one representative designated by the Illinois 21    Chapter of National Emergency Number Association (NENA);22        (3) one representative designated by the Illinois 23    Chapter of Association of Public Safety Communications 24    Officials (APCO);25        (4) one representative of the Division Behavioral 26    Health and Recovery of the Department of Human Services of   HB5468- 64 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    Mental Health;2        (5) one representative of the Illinois Department of 3    Public Health;4        (6) one representative of a statewide organization of 5    EMS responders;6        (7) one representative of a statewide organization of 7    fire chiefs;8        (8) two representatives of statewide organizations of 9    law enforcement; 10        (9) two representatives of mental health, behavioral 11    health, or substance abuse providers; and12        (10) four representatives of advocacy organizations 13    either led by or consisting primarily of individuals with 14    intellectual or developmental disabilities, individuals 15    with behavioral disabilities, or individuals with lived 16    experience; and .17        (11) one representative of the Division of 18    Developmental Disabilities of the Department of Human 19    Services. 20    (e) The members of the Statewide Advisory Committee, other 21than the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, shall be appointed by 22the Secretary of Human Services.23    (f) The Statewide Advisory Committee shall continue to 24meet until this Act has been fully implemented, as determined 25by the Department Division of Mental Health, and mobile mental 26health relief providers are available in all parts of   HB5468- 65 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1Illinois. The Department Division of Mental Health may 2reconvene the Statewide Advisory Committee at its discretion 3after full implementation of this Act. 4(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 104-155, eff. 8-1-25.) 5    (50 ILCS 754/45)6    Sec. 45. Regional Advisory Committees. 7    (a) The Department Division of Mental Health shall 8establish Regional Advisory Committees in each EMS Region to 9advise on regional issues related to emergency response 10systems for mental and behavioral health. The Secretary of 11Human Services shall appoint the members of the Regional 12Advisory Committees. Each Regional Advisory Committee shall 13consist of: 14        (1) representatives of the 9-1-1 PSAPs in the region;15        (2) representatives of the EMS Medical Directors 16    Committee, as constituted under the Emergency Medical 17    Services (EMS) Systems Act, or other similar committee 18    serving the medical needs of the jurisdiction;19        (3) representatives of law enforcement officials with 20    jurisdiction in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 21    Regions;22        (4) representatives of both the EMS providers and the 23    unions representing EMS or emergency mental and behavioral 24    health responders, or both; and25        (5) advocates from the mental health, behavioral   HB5468- 66 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    health, intellectual disability, and developmental 2    disability communities.3    If no person is willing or available to fill a member's 4seat for one of the required areas of representation on a 5Regional Advisory Committee under paragraphs (1) through (5), 6the Secretary of Human Services shall adopt procedures to 7ensure that a missing area of representation is filled once a 8person becomes willing and available to fill that seat. 9    (b) The majority of advocates on the Regional Advisory 10Committee must either be individuals with a lived experience 11of a condition commonly regarded as a mental health or 12behavioral health disability, developmental disability, or 13intellectual disability or be from organizations primarily 14composed of such individuals. The members of the Committee 15shall also reflect the racial demographics of the jurisdiction 16served. To achieve the requirements of this subsection, the 17Department Division of Mental Health must establish a clear 18plan and regular course of action to engage, recruit, and 19sustain areas of established participation. The plan and 20actions taken must be shared with the general public. 21    (c) Subject to the oversight of the Department of Human 22Services Division of Mental Health, the EMS Medical Directors 23Committee or a chair appointed in agreement of the Department 24Division of Mental Health and the EMS Medical Directors 25Committee is responsible for convening the meetings of the 26committee. Qualifications for appointment as chair under this   HB5468- 67 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1subsection include a demonstrated understanding of the tasks 2of the Regional Advisory Committee as well as standing within 3the region as a leader capable of building consensus for the 4purpose of achieving the tasks assigned to the committee. 5Impacted units of local government may also have 6representatives on the committee subject to approval by the 7Department Division of Mental Health, if this participation is 8structured in such a way that it does not give undue weight to 9any of the groups represented.10(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 11103-645, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (50 ILCS 754/50)13    Sec. 50. Regional Advisory Committee responsibilities. 14Each Regional Advisory Committee and subregional committee 15established by the Regional Advisory Committee are responsible 16for designing the local protocols to allow its region's or 17subregion's 9-1-1 call centers and emergency responders to 18coordinate their activities with 9-8-8 as required by this Act 19and monitoring current operation to advise on ongoing 20adjustments to the local protocols. A subregional committee, 21which may be convened by a majority vote of a Regional Advisory 22Committee, must include members that are representative of all 23required categories of the full Regional Advisory Committee 24and must provide guidance to the Regional Advisory Committees 25on adjustments that need to be made for local level   HB5468- 68 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1operationalization of protocols. Included in this 2responsibility, each Regional Advisory Committee or 3subregional committee must:4        (1) negotiate the appropriate amendment of each 9-1-1 5    PSAP emergency dispatch protocols, in consultation with 6    each 9-1-1 PSAP in the EMS Region and consistent with 7    national certification requirements;8        (2) set maximum response times for 9-8-8 to provide 9    service when an in-person response is required, based on 10    type of mental or behavioral health emergency, which, if 11    exceeded, constitute grounds for sending other emergency 12    responders through the 9-1-1 system;13        (3) report, geographically by police district if 14    practical, the data collected through the direction 15    provided by the Statewide Advisory Committee in 16    aggregated, non-individualized monthly reports. These 17    reports shall be available to the Regional Advisory 18    Committee members, subregional committee members, the 19    Department of Human Service Division of Mental Health, the 20    Administrator of the 9-1-1 Authority, and to the public 21    upon request;22        (4) convene, after the initial regional policies are 23    established, at least every 2 years to consider amendment 24    of the regional policies, if any, and also convene 25    whenever a member of the Committee requests that the 26    Committee or subregional committee consider an amendment;   HB5468- 69 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    and 2        (5) identify regional resources and supports for use 3    by the mobile mental health relief providers as they 4    respond to the requests for services; .5        (6) review regional and subregional crisis response 6    system capacities and resources to inform planning and 7    implementation and to foster collaboration across all 8    sectors of the system; and9        (7) determine community needs and make a plan to 10    support local communities to develop and use other 11    resources to create additional mobile mental health relief 12    provider services to expand the capacity to provide more 13    immediate service coverage where needed. These additional 14    mobile mental health relief provider services may be 15    dispatched from 9-1-1, 9-8-8, or successor dispatch 16    systems and shall be subject to the same standards and 17    requirements as mobile mental health relief providers 18    funded by the State. 19(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 20103-645, eff. 7-1-24.) 21    (50 ILCS 754/65)22    Sec. 65. PSAP and emergency service dispatched through a 239-1-1 PSAP; coordination of activities with mobile and 24behavioral health services. 25    (a) Each 9-1-1 PSAP and emergency service dispatched   HB5468- 70 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1through a 9-1-1 PSAP must begin coordinating its activities 2with the mobile mental and behavioral health services 3established by the Department Division of Mental Health once 4all 3 of the following conditions are met, but not later than 5July 1, 2027: 6        (1) the Statewide Committee has negotiated useful 7    protocol and 9-1-1 operator script adjustments with the 8    contracted services providing these tools to 9-1-1 PSAPs 9    operating in Illinois;10        (2) the appropriate Regional Advisory Committee has 11    completed design of the specific 9-1-1 PSAP's process for 12    coordinating activities with the mobile mental and 13    behavioral health service; and 14        (3) the mobile mental and behavioral health service is 15    available in their jurisdiction.16    (b) To achieve the conditions of subsection (a) by July 1, 172027, the following activities shall be completed:18        (1) No later than June 30, 2025, pilot testing of the 19    revised protocols;20        (2) No later than June 30, 2026:21            (A) assessment and evaluation of the pilots;22            (B) revisions, as needed, of protocols and 23        operations based on assessment and evaluation of the 24        pilots;25            (C) implementation of revised protocols at pilot 26        sites; and  HB5468- 71 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1            (D) implementation of revised protocols by PSAPs 2        who are ready to implement, otherwise known as early 3        adopters; and4        (3) No later than June 30, 2027, implementation of 5    revised protocols by all remaining PSAPs, including any 6    PSAPs that previously cited financial barriers to updating 7    systems.8(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 103-645, eff. 7-1-24; 9104-155, eff. 8-1-25.) 10    (50 ILCS 754/70)11    Sec. 70. Report. On or before July 1, 2026 2023 and on an 12annual a quarterly basis thereafter, the Department Division 13of Mental Health shall submit a report to the General Assembly 14on its progress in implementing this Act until full 15implementation has been achieved statewide, as determined by 16the Department. The report , which shall include, but not be 17limited to, a strategic assessment that evaluates the success 18toward current strategy, identification of future targets for 19implementation that help estimate the potential for success 20and provides a basis for assessing future performance, and key 21benchmarks to provide a comparison to set in context and help 22stakeholders understand their positions.23(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.) 24    (50 ILCS 754/75 new)  HB5468- 72 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1    Sec. 75. Oversight of PSAP compliance.2    (a) The Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator shall 3monitor and require public safety answering points to comply 4with the requirements of this Act in accordance with Sections 57.2 and 7.3 of the Emergency Telephone System Act. The 6Department shall provide consultation and collaboration to the 7Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, as appropriate, to support PSAP 8compliance with this Act.9    (b) The Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator shall 10consult, as appropriate, with the Department to support PSAP 11compliance under this Act. In carrying out the responsibility 12under subsection (a), the Department shall provide 13consultation, resources, collaboration, and guidance to the 14Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, as appropriate, to support PSAP 15compliance with the Community Emergency Services and Support 16Act. The guidance shall include required data elements, 17reporting formats, and a mechanism for reporting provider 18service data to support monitoring, verification, and quality 19improvement. 20    (50 ILCS 754/80 new)21    Sec. 80. Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules to 22implement and administer this Act.  HB5468- 73 -LRB104 20696 WRO 34196 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 2605/2605-514    50 ILCS 705/10.175    50 ILCS 750/2from Ch. 134, par. 326    50 ILCS 750/7.2 new7    50 ILCS 750/7.3 new8    50 ILCS 754/59    50 ILCS 754/1510    50 ILCS 754/2011    50 ILCS 754/2512    50 ILCS 754/3013    50 ILCS 754/3514    50 ILCS 754/4015    50 ILCS 754/4516    50 ILCS 754/5017    50 ILCS 754/6518    50 ILCS 754/7019    50 ILCS 754/75 new20    50 ILCS 754/80 new